src/fst/affixes/propernouns.lexc
LEXICON PROP_29KUU !!= * @CODE@ kuu:kuu
!! Gradation: No
: PROP-PLC-DOWNCASE-SG-GEN ;
 PROP_29KUU-SG ;
 PROP_29KUU-PL ;
LEXICON PROP_29KUU-SG
:%{back%} NMN_29KUU/HAEAE-SG ;
LEXICON PROP_29KUU-PL
:%{back%} NMN_29KUU/HAEAE-PL ;

LEXICON PROP_29HAEAE !!= * @CODE@ kuu:kuu
!! Gradation: No
: PROP-PLC-DOWNCASE-SG-GEN ;
 PROP_29HAEAE-SG ;
 PROP_29HAEAE-PL ;
LEXICON PROP_29HAEAE-SG
:%{front%} NMN_29KUU/HAEAE-SG ;
LEXICON PROP_29HAEAE-PL
:%{front%} NMN_29KUU/HAEAE-PL ;

LEXICON PROP_30MAA
! Gradation: No
: PROP-PLC-DOWNCASE-SG-GEN ;
 PROP_30MAA-SG ;
 PROP_30MAA-PL ;
LEXICON PROP_30MAA-SG
:%{back%} NMN_30MAA/TUEUE-SG ;
LEXICON PROP_30MAA-PL
:%{back%} NMN_30MAA/TUEUE-PL ;


LEXICON PROP_30TUEUE
! Gradation: No
: PROP-PLC-DOWNCASE-SG-GEN ;
 PROP_30TUEUE-SG ;
 PROP_30TUEUE-PL ;
LEXICON PROP_30TUEUE-SG
:%{front%} NMN_30MAA/TUEUE-SG ;
LEXICON PROP_30TUEUE-PL
:%{front%} NMN_30MAA/TUEUE-PL ;

!LEXICON PROP_31MAI
!! Gradation: No
!: PROP-PLC-DOWNCASE-SG-GEN ;
! PROP_31MAI-SG ;
! PROP_31MAI-PL ;
!LEXICON PROP_31MAI-SG
!:%{back%} NMN_31MAI-SG ;
!LEXICON PROP_31MAI-PL
!:%{back%} NMN_31MAI-PL ;

!LEXICON PROP_31TAEI
! Gradation: No
!: PROP-PLC-DOWNCASE-SG-GEN ;
! PROP_31TAEI-SG ;
! PROP_31TAEI-PL ;
!LEXICON PROP_31TAEI-SG
!:%{front%} NMN_31TAEI-SG ;
!LEXICON PROP_31TAEI-PL
!:%{front%} NMN_31TAEI-PL ;

!LEXICON PROP_32VERI !!veri:ver
!:%>e PROP-PLC-DOWNCASE-SG-GEN ;
! PROP_32VERI-SG ;
! PROP_32VERI-PL ;
!LEXICON PROP_32VERI-SG
!:%{front%} NMN_32VERI-SG ;
!LEXICON PROP_32VERI-PL
!:%{front%} NMN_32VERI-PL ;

LEXICON PROP_PLC_33MAEGI/GEN !mägi+N:mä%{kØ%}%{kgØ%} N_33MAEGI "_#e, #ke__mä|gi_" ;
!! gradation: yes
:%^Pen%^WGStem PROP-PLC-DOWNCASE-SG-GEN ;
 PROP_PLC_33MAEGI-SG ;
! PROP_PLC_33MAEGI-PL ;
LEXICON PROP_PLC_33MAEGI-SG
+Sem/Plc:%{front%}%^G1%>%{eõ%} Harm_Neutr_SG-NOM  ;
+Sem/Plc:%{front%} NMN_33JWGI/MAEGI-SG-OBL ;
!LEXICON PROP_PLC_33MAEGI-PL
!+Sem/Plc:%{front%} NMN_33JWGI/MAEGI-PL ;

!LEXICON PROP_33IGAE !!igä:igä
!! gradation: yes
!:%^Pen%^WGStem PROP-PLC-DOWNCASE-SG-GEN ;
! PROP_33IGAE-SG ;
! PROP_33IGAE-PL ;
!LEXICON PROP_33IGAE-SG
!:%{front%} NMN_33XX/IGAE-SG ;
!LEXICON PROP_33IGAE-PL
!:%{front%} NMN_33XX/IGAE-PL ;

!LEXICON PROP_34TULI
!:%>õ PROP-PLC-DOWNCASE-SG-GEN ;
! PROP_34TULI-SG ;
! PROP_34TULI-PL ;
!LEXICON PROP_34TULI-SG
!:%{back%} NMN_34TULI/SÜLI-SG ;
!LEXICON PROP_34TULI-PL
!:%{back%} NMN_34TULI/SÜLI-PL ;

!LEXICON PROP_35TARW
!! tarõ:tar
!: PROP-PLC-DOWNCASE-SG-GEN ;
! PROP_35TARW-SG ;
! PROP_35TARW-PL ;
!LEXICON PROP_35TARW-SG
!:%{back%} NMN_35TARW-SG ;
!LEXICON PROP_35TARW-PL
!:%{back%} NMN_35TARW-PL ;


!LEXICON PROP_35NIMI
!! nimi:nim
!:%>e PROP-PLC-DOWNCASE-SG-GEN ;
! PROP_35NIMI-SG ;
! PROP_35NIMI-PL ;
!LEXICON PROP_35NIMI-SG
!:%{front%} NMN_35LUMI/NIMI-SG ;
!LEXICON PROP_35NIMI-PL
!:%{front%} NMN_35LUMI/NIMI-PL ;

LEXICON PROP_35UMA
!! pesä:pesä
: PROP-PLC-DOWNCASE-SG-GEN ;
 PROP_35UMA-SG ;
 PROP_35UMA-PL ;
LEXICON PROP_35UMA-SG
:%{back%} NMN_35UMA/PESAE-SG ;
LEXICON PROP_35UMA-PL
:%{back%} NMN_35UMA/PESAE-PL ;

LEXICON PROP_35PESAE
!! pesä:pesä
: PROP-PLC-DOWNCASE-SG-GEN ;
 PROP_35PESAE-SG ;
 PROP_35PESAE-PL ;
LEXICON PROP_35PESAE-SG
:%{front%} NMN_35UMA/PESAE-SG ;
LEXICON PROP_35PESAE-PL
:%{front%} NMN_35UMA/PESAE-PL ;

LEXICON PROP_36TUUM1 !!= @CODE@ tuuḿ:t%{ou%}%{ou%}m
:%^VOWLower%>õ PROP-PLC-DOWNCASE-SG-GEN ;
@U.Cap.Obl@ PROP_36TUUM1-SG ;
@U.Cap.Obl@ PROP_36TUUM1-PL ;
LEXICON PROP_36TUUM1-SG
:%{back%} NMN_36TUUM1/XX1-SG-OBL ; !!= @CODE@ This allows for place names, which, for the most part, have nominative singulars that are identical to their genitive singulars.
:%{back%}%^VOWLower%^WGStem%>%{eõ%} Harm_Neutr_SG-NOM ;

LEXICON PROP_36TUUM1-PL
:%{back%}     NMN_36TUUM1/XX1-PL ; 

!LEXICON PROP_36HANG1 !!= @CODE@ hanǵ:hangʼ
!:%>õ PROP-PLC-DOWNCASE-SG-GEN ;
!@U.Cap.Obl@ PROP_36HANG1-SG ;
!@U.Cap.Obl@ PROP_36HANG1-PL ;
!LEXICON PROP_36HANG1-SG
!:%{back%}     NMN_36HANG1/SAERG1-SG ;
!LEXICON PROP_36HANG1-PL
!:%{back%}     NMN_36HANG1/SAERG1-PL ;

LEXICON PROP_36SAERG1 !!= @CODE@ särǵ:särgʼ
:%^WGSteme%> PROP-PLC-DOWNCASE-SG-GEN ;
@U.Cap.Obl@  PROP_36SAERG1-SG ;
@U.Cap.Obl@  PROP_36SAERG1-PL ;
LEXICON PROP_36SAERG1-SG
:%{front%}     NMN_36HANG1/SAERG1-SG ;
LEXICON PROP_36SAERG1-PL
:%{front%}     NMN_36HANG1/SAERG1-PL ;

LEXICON PROP_36PAEIV !!= @CODE@ päiv:päiv
:%^ÄI2ÄÄ%>ä PROP-PLC-DOWNCASE-SG-GEN ;
@U.Cap.Obl@  PROP_36PAEIV-SG ;
@U.Cap.Obl@  PROP_36PAEIV-PL ;
LEXICON PROP_36PAEIV-SG
:%{front%}     NMN_36PAEIV-SG ;
LEXICON PROP_36PAEIV-PL
:%{front%}     NMN_36PAEIV-PL ;

!LEXICON PROP_KOGWR
!! kogõr:kogõr
!! * Yaml: **N-kogwr36**
!! derived from 36särǵ
!:%^Pen%^VowRM%>õ PROP-PLC-DOWNCASE-SG-GEN ;
!@U.Cap.Obl@  PROP_KOGWR-SG ;
!@U.Cap.Obl@  PROP_KOGWR-PL ;
!LEXICON PROP_KOGWR-SG
!:%{back%}     NMN_KOGWR-SG ;
!LEXICON PROP_KOGWR-PL
!:%{back%}     NMN_KOGWR-PL ;

!LEXICON PROP_46SWBWR
!!! sõbõr:sõbõr
!!! * Yaml: __N-swbwr36__
!!! derived from 36särǵ
!:%^Pen%^VowRM%>a PROP-PLC-DOWNCASE-SG-GEN ;
!@U.Cap.Obl@  PROP_46SWBWR-SG ;
!@U.Cap.Obl@  PROP_46SWBWR-PL ;
!LEXICON PROP_46SWBWR-SG
!:%{back%}     NMN_46SWBWR-SG ;
!LEXICON PROP_46SWBWR-PL
!:%{back%}     NMN_46SWBWR-PL ;


LEXICON PROP_37PINI !!= @CODE@ pini:pini
:%^Pen%^WGStem PROP-PLC-DOWNCASE-SG-GEN ;
@U.Cap.Obl@  PROP_37PINI-SG ;
@U.Cap.Obl@  PROP_37PINI-PL ;
LEXICON PROP_37PINI-SG
:%{front%}     NMN_37WLI/PINI-SG ;
LEXICON PROP_37PINI-PL
:%{front%}     NMN_37WLI/PINI-PL ;

LEXICON PROP_37WLI !!= @CODE@ pini:pini
:%^Pen%^WGStem PROP-PLC-DOWNCASE-SG-GEN ;
@U.Cap.Obl@  PROP_37WLI-SG ;
@U.Cap.Obl@  PROP_37WLI-PL ;
LEXICON PROP_37WLI-SG
:%{back%}     NMN_37WLI/PINI-SG ;
LEXICON PROP_37WLI-PL
:%{back%}     NMN_37WLI/PINI-PL ;

!LEXICON PROP_38PUNG
!:a PROP-PLC-DOWNCASE-SG-GEN ;
! PROP_38PUNG-SG ;
! PROP_38PUNG-PL ;
!LEXICON PROP_38PUNG-SG
!:%{back%} NMN_38PUNG-SG ;
!LEXICON PROP_38PUNG-PL
!:%{back%} NMN_38PUNG-PL ;

LEXICON PROP_38PULL1 !!= * @CODE@ pulĺ:pull
:%^NoPAL%>i PROP-PLC-DOWNCASE-SG-GEN ;
 PROP_38PULL1-SG ;
 PROP_38PULL1-PL ;
LEXICON PROP_38PULL1-SG
:%{back%} NMN_38PULL1/VIKS1-SG ;
LEXICON PROP_38PULL1-PL
:%{back%} NMN_38PULL1/VIKS1-PL ;

LEXICON PROP_38VIKS1 !!= * @CODE@ pulĺ:pull
:%^NoPAL%>i PROP-PLC-DOWNCASE-SG-GEN ;
 PROP_38VIKS1-SG ;
 PROP_38VIKS1-PL ;
LEXICON PROP_38VIKS1-SG
:%{front%} NMN_38PULL1/VIKS1-SG ;
LEXICON PROP_38VIKS1-PL
:%{front%} NMN_38PULL1/VIKS1-PL ;

LEXICON PROP_38PAPP1 !!= * @CODE@ papṕ:papp
:%^WGStem%>i PROP-PLC-DOWNCASE-SG-GEN ;
 PROP_38PAPP1-SG ;
 PROP_38PAPP1-PL ;
LEXICON PROP_38PAPP1-SG
:%{back%} NMN_38PAPP1/REHK1-SG ;
LEXICON PROP_38PAPP1-PL
:%{back%} NMN_38PAPP1/REHK1-PL ;

!LEXICON PROP_38HUETT !!= * @CODE@ hütt:hütt
!:ü PROP-PLC-DOWNCASE-SG-GEN ;
! PROP_38HUETT-SG ;
! PROP_38HUETT-PL ;
!LEXICON PROP_38HUETT-SG
!:%{front%} NMN_38HUETT-SG ;
!LEXICON PROP_38HUETT-PL
!:%{front%} NMN_38HUETT-PL ;

!LEXICON PROP_38KULD
!:%^WGStem%>a PROP-PLC-DOWNCASE-SG-GEN ;
! PROP_38KULD-SG ;
! PROP_38KULD-PL ;
!LEXICON PROP_38KULD-SG
!:%{back%} NMN_38KULD-SG ;
!LEXICON PROP_38KULD-PL
!:%{back%} NMN_38KULD-PL ;

!LEXICON PROP_39HAEBUE !!= * @CODE@ häbü:häbü
!:%^Pen%^WGStem PROP-PLC-DOWNCASE-SG-GEN ;
!@U.Cap.Obl@  PROP_39HAEBUE-SG ;
!@U.Cap.Obl@  PROP_39HAEBUE-PL ;
!LEXICON PROP_39HAEBUE-SG
!:%{front%}     NMN_39HAEBUE-SG ;
!LEXICON PROP_39HAEBUE-PL
!:%{front%}     NMN_39HAEBUE-PL ;


LEXICON PROP_40TALO !!= @CODE@ talo:talo
: PROP-PLC-DOWNCASE-SG-GEN ;
@U.Cap.Obl@  PROP_40TALO-SG ;
@U.Cap.Obl@  PROP_40TALO-PL ;
LEXICON PROP_40TALO-SG
:%{back%}     NMN_40TALO/HELUE-SG ;
LEXICON PROP_40TALO-PL
:%{back%}     NMN_40TALO/HELUE-PL ;

LEXICON PROP_40UJA !!= @CODE@ uja:uja
: PROP-PLC-DOWNCASE-SG-GEN ;
@U.Cap.Obl@  PROP_40UJA-SG ;
@U.Cap.Obl@  PROP_40UJA-PL ;
LEXICON PROP_40UJA-SG
:%{back%}     NMN_40UJA/IJAE-SG ;
LEXICON PROP_40UJA-PL
:%{back%}     NMN_40UJA/IJAE-PL ;


!LEXICON PROP_41KAND !!= @CODE@ kand:kand
!!! * Yaml: __aig, kand__
!:%^WGStem%>o PROP-PLC-DOWNCASE-SG-GEN ;
!@U.Cap.Obl@ PROP_41KAND-SG ;
!@U.Cap.Obl@ PROP_41KAND-PL ;
!LEXICON PROP_41KAND-SG
!:%{back%}     NMN_41KAND-SG ;
!LEXICON PROP_41KAND-PL
!:%{back%}     NMN_41KAND-PL ;

!LEXICON PROP_41AIG !!= @CODE@ aig:aig
!!! * Yaml: __aig, aig__
!:%^WGStem%>o PROP-PLC-DOWNCASE-SG-GEN ;
!@U.Cap.Obl@  PROP_41AIG-SG ;
!@U.Cap.Obl@ PROP_41AIG-PL ;
!LEXICON PROP_41AIG-SG
!:%{back%}     NMN_41AIG-SG ;
!LEXICON PROP_41AIG-PL
!:%{back%}     NMN_41AIG-PL ;

LEXICON PROP_41ASK !!= @CODE@ ask:asko
!! * Yaml: __aig, aig__
:%^WGStem PROP-PLC-DOWNCASE-SG-GEN ;
@U.Cap.Obl@  PROP_41ASK-SG ;
@U.Cap.Obl@ PROP_41ASK-PL ;
LEXICON PROP_41ASK-SG
:%{back%}     NMN_41ASK/VIIT-SG ;
LEXICON PROP_41ASK-PL
:%{back%}     NMN_41ASK/VIIT-PL ;


!LEXICON PROP_42VARI
!:%^Pen%^PAL%^Pen%^WGStem PROP-PLC-DOWNCASE-SG-GEN ;
!@U.Cap.Obl@  PROP_42VARI-SG ;
!@U.Cap.Obl@  PROP_42VARI-PL ;
!LEXICON PROP_42VARI-SG
!:%{back%}     NMN_42VARI-SG ;
!LEXICON PROP_42VARI-PL
!:%{back%}     NMN_42VARI-PL ;


!LEXICON PROP_43KANARIK !!= @CODE@
!:%^WGStem%>u PROP-PLC-DOWNCASE-SG-GEN ;
!@U.Cap.Obl@  PROP_43KANARIK-SG ;
!@U.Cap.Obl@  PROP_43KANARIK-PL ;
!LEXICON PROP_43KANARIK-SG
!:%{back%}     NMN_43KANARIK/ELAENIK-SG ;
!LEXICON PROP_43KANARIK-PL
!:%{back%}     NMN_43KANARIK/ELAENIK-PL ;

!LEXICON PROP_43ELAENIK !!= @CODE@
!:%^WGStem%>u PROP-PLC-DOWNCASE-SG-GEN ;
!@U.Cap.Obl@  PROP_43ELAENIK-SG ;
!@U.Cap.Obl@  PROP_43ELAENIK-PL ;
!LEXICON PROP_43ELAENIK-SG
!@U.VowHarm.F@:@U.VowHarm.F@%{back%}     NMN_43KANARIK/ELAENIK-SG ;
!LEXICON PROP_43ELAENIK-PL
!@U.VowHarm.F@:@U.VowHarm.F@%{back%}     NMN_43KANARIK/ELAENIK-PL ;


LEXICON PROP_44SWDA !!= @CODE@ sõda:sõda
:%^Pen%^WGStem PROP-PLC-DOWNCASE-SG-GEN ;
@U.Cap.Obl@  PROP_44SWDA-SG ;
@U.Cap.Obl@ PROP_44SWDA-PL ;
LEXICON PROP_44SWDA-SG
:%{back%}     NMN_44SWDA-SG ;
LEXICON PROP_44SWDA-PL
:%{back%}     NMN_44SWDA-PL ;


!LEXICON PROP_45KANA !!= @CODE@ kana:kana
!:%^Pen%^WGStem PROP-PLC-DOWNCASE-SG-GEN ;
!@U.Cap.Obl@ PROP_45KANA-SG ;
!@U.Cap.Obl@ PROP_45KANA-PL ;
!LEXICON PROP_45KANA-SG
!:%{back%}     NMN_45KANA/RIHÄ-SG ;
!LEXICON PROP_45KANA-PL
!:%{back%}     NMN_45KANA/RIHÄ-PL ;



LEXICON PROP_46HAIN !!= @CODE@ hain:hain
!! * Yaml: **N-jalg, N-hain**
:%^WGStem%>a PROP-PLC-DOWNCASE-SG-GEN ;
@U.Cap.Obl@ PROP_46HAIN-SG ;
@U.Cap.Obl@ PROP_46HAIN-PL ;
LEXICON PROP_46HAIN-SG
:%{back%}     NMN_46HAIN-SG ;
LEXICON PROP_46HAIN-PL
:%{back%}     NMN_46HAIN-PL ;


!LEXICON PROP_47ASI !!= @CODE@ asi:asi
!:%^PAL%^VowRM%>a PROP-PLC-DOWNCASE-SG-GEN ;
!@U.Cap.Obl@  PROP_47ASI-SG ;
!@U.Cap.Obl@  PROP_47ASI-PL ;
!LEXICON PROP_47ASI-SG
!:%{back%}     NMN_47ASI-SG ;
!LEXICON PROP_47ASI-PL
!:%{back%}     NMN_47ASI-PL ;



!LEXICON PROP_2KASUNUQ !!= * @CODE@ kasunuq:kasunu
!: PROP-PLC-DOWNCASE-SG-GEN ;
!@U.Cap.Obl@  PROP_2KASUNUQ-SG  ;
!@U.Cap.Obl@  PROP_2KASUNUQ-PL  ;

!LEXICON  PROP_2KASUNUQ-SG
!:%{back%} NMN_2KASUNUQ/ELAENUEQ-SG  ;
!LEXICON PROP_2KASUNUQ-PL
!:%{back%} NMN_2KASUNUQ/ELAENUEQ-PL  ;

!LEXICON PROP_2ELAENUEQ !!= * @CODE@ elänüq:elänü
!: PROP-PLC-DOWNCASE-SG-GEN ;
!@U.Cap.Obl@  PROP_2ELAENUEQ-SG  ;
!@U.Cap.Obl@  PROP_2ELAENUEQ-PL  ;

!LEXICON  PROP_2ELAENUEQ-SG
!:%{front%} NMN_2KASUNUQ/ELAENUEQ-SG  ;
!LEXICON PROP_2ELAENUEQ-PL
!:%{front%} NMN_2KASUNUQ/ELAENUEQ-PL  ;


! vim: set ft=xfst-lexc:
